District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1001

Council findings.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 2, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
This section is referenced in § 47-872.
1981 Ed., § 6-3401.
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 2 to 11 of Solid Waste Facility Permit Temporary Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-251, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1650).
For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-11 of the Solid Waste Facility Permit Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-384, December 28, 1994, 42 DCR 45).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 10-251, the “Solid Waste Facility Permit Temporary Act of 1994”, see Mayor’s Order 95-754, May 19, 1995.
Delegation of Authority under the District of Columbia Solid Waste Disposal Act of 1989 21 DCMR 700.1 et seq., see Mayor’s Order 2005-123, August 29, 2005 ( 52 DCR 8666).
Resolution 16-395, the “Solid Waste Disposal Fee Regulation Amendment Approval Resolution of 2005. 21 DCMR 700.1 et seq. ”, was approved effective November 26, 2005.
Former subchapters II and III of this chapter have been recodified as Chapters 10C and 10D of this title, respectively. The code section numbers remain unchanged.